Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.188.084

Mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program—Coordinator—Staff.

A coordinator shall be hired to administer the program. Additional staff as necessary may be hired.

[ 1984 c 265 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.625.220, 28A.03.434.]

NOTES:

Implementation—Funding required—1984 c 265: See note following RCW 28A.188.080.